District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.23

Increased annuities for certain surviving spouses or domestic partners.

Effective on November 1, 1969, or the commencing date of the annuity, whichever is later, the annuity of each surviving spouse or domestic partner whose entitlement to annuity payable from the District of Columbia Teachers’ Retirement and Annuity Fund resulted from the death of: (1) a teacher prior to October 24, 1962; or (2) a retired teacher whose retirement was based on a separation from service prior to October 24, 1962; shall be increased by 20%.

History

Aug. 7, 1946, ch. 779, § 23
as added May 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 258, Pub. L. 91-263, § 1(g)
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 32(e), 55 DCR 6758

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1242.
1973 Ed., § 31-739d.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-231, in subsec. (b)(1)(B), substituted “spouse or domestic partner” for “spouse”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 38-2021.24 and 38-2021.25, see §§ 3602 to 3604 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).